xetex/share/texmf-dist/tex/generic/dehyph-exptl/dehypht-x-2019-04-04.pat
2zunr
2z1uns
2zunt
zuo2
zup2fi
zu3pfr
zu3r2a
2z1urk
2z1url
2z1urn
2z1urs
2z1urt
zu3ru
zu3s2
zusch4
zus4p
zus4t
zu3t2
zut4r
zut4u
zu4t3z
zuz4w
2züb
zü4be
3züc
zür1c
2zv
z2w2
z3wac
2zwag
2zwah
z4wang
z3war
2zwa2s
2zwäc
2zwär
2zwäs
z3wech
z4weck
2z3wed
2zweg
2zweh
z4weig
2zweil
zweiter4
2z3wel
2z3wen
2z3wer
z4werg
2z3wes
z4wic
zwi4e
3zwing
2zwirt
z4wisc
2zwiss
z4wit
2z3wo
z3wör
z3wur
2z3wü
zy2le
2zz
z3z2a
zzab4
zz4at
z3zer
zze3s
z3zi
z4z1id
zz1in
z3zo
z4zor
zz2ö
z3zu
zzug2s
}

\endinput

%%% Local Variables:
%%% mode: tex
%%% coding: utf-8
%%% End:
